Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.120

Removal of liquidator—Appellate review.

The court, upon notice and hearing, may remove the liquidator for cause. Appellate review of the order of removal may be sought as in other civil cases.

During the pendency of any appeal, the director of financial institutions shall act as liquidator of the association, without giving any additional bond for the performance of the duties as such liquidator.

If such order of removal shall be affirmed, the director of financial institutions shall name another liquidator for the association, which nominee, upon qualifying as required for receivers generally, shall succeed to the position of liquidator of the association.

[ 1994 c 92 s 463; 1988 c 202 s 34; 1982 c 3 s 72; 1971 c 81 s 86; 1945 c 235 s 113; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-232.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Appeal procedures superseded by RAP 2.1, 2.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.